Wisconsin, session 2025, SB923.
do enact as follows:SB923,15Section 1. 6.02 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB923,2,266.02 (1) Every U.S. citizen age 18 or older who has resided in an election 1district or ward for 28 10 consecutive days before any election where the citizen 2offers to vote is an eligible elector.SB923,23Section 2. 6.02 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB923,2,846.02 (2) Any U.S. citizen age 18 or older who moves within this state later 5than 28 10 days before an election shall vote at his or her previous ward or election 6district if the person is otherwise qualified. If the elector can comply with the 28-7day 10-day residence requirement at the new address and is otherwise qualified, he 8or she may vote in the new ward or election district.SB923,39Section 3. 6.10 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB923,2,17106.10 (3) When an elector moves his or her residence from one ward or 11municipality to another ward or municipality within the state at least 28 10 days 12before the election, the elector may vote in and be considered a resident of the new 13ward or municipality where residing upon registering at the proper polling place or 14other registration location in the new ward or municipality under s. 6.55 (2) or 6.86 15(3) (a) 2. If the elector moves his or her residence later than 28 10 days before an 16election, the elector shall vote in the elector’s former ward or municipality if 17otherwise qualified to vote there.SB923,418Section 4. 6.10 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB923,3,7196.10 (4) The residence of an unmarried person sleeping in one ward and 20boarding in another is the place where the person sleeps. The residence of an 21unmarried person in a transient vocation, a teacher or a student who boards at 22different places for part of the week, month, or year, if one of the places is the 23residence of the person’s parents, is the place of the parents’ residence unless 1through registration or similar act the person elects to establish a residence 2elsewhere. If the person has no parents and if the person has not registered 3elsewhere, the person’s residence shall be at the place that the person considered 4his or her residence in preference to any other for at least 28 10 consecutive days 5before an election. If this place is within the municipality, the person is entitled to 6all the privileges and subject to all the duties of other citizens having their 7residence there, including voting.SB923,58Section 5. 6.15 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB923,3,1496.15 (1) Qualifications. Any person who was or who is an eligible elector 10under ss. 6.02 and 6.03, except that he or she has been a resident of this state for 11less than 28 10 consecutive days prior to the date of the presidential election, is 12entitled to vote for the president and vice president but for no other offices. The fact 13that the person was not registered to vote in the state from which he or she moved 14does not prevent voting in this state if the elector is otherwise qualified.SB923,615Section 6. 6.15 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB923,3,23166.15 (2) (a) The elector’s request for the application form may be made in 17person to the municipal clerk of the municipality where the person resides. 18Application may be made not sooner than 27 9 days nor later than 5 p.m. on the day 19before the election, or may be made at the proper polling place in the ward or 20election district in which the elector resides. If an elector makes application before 21election day, the application form shall be returned to the municipal clerk after the 22affidavit has been signed in the presence of the clerk or any officer authorized by 23law to administer oaths. The affidavit shall be in substantially the following form:SB923,4,11STATE OF WISCONSINSB923,4,22County of ....SB923,4,133I, ...., do solemnly swear that I am a citizen of the United States; that prior to 4establishing Wisconsin residence, my legal residence was in the .... (town) (village) 5(city) of ...., state of ...., residing at .... (street address); that on the day of the next 6presidential election, I shall be at least 18 years of age and that I have been a legal 7resident of the state of Wisconsin since ...., .... (year), residing at .... (street address), 8in the [.... ward of the .... aldermanic district of] the (town) (village) (city) of ...., 9county of ....; that I have resided in the state less than 28 10 consecutive days, that 10I am qualified to vote for president and vice president at the election to be held 11November ...., .... (year), that I am not voting at any other place in this election and 12that I hereby make application for an official presidential ballot, in accordance with 13section 6.15 of the Wisconsin statutes.SB923,4,1414Signed ....SB923,4,1515P.O. Address ....SB923,4,1616Subscribed and sworn to before me this .... day of ...., .... (year)SB923,4,1717....(Name)SB923,4,1818....(Title)SB923,719Section 7. 6.18 (form) of the statutes is amended to read:SB923,4,23206.18 (form) This form shall be returned to the municipal clerk’s office. 21Application must be received in sufficient time for ballots to be mailed and returned 22prior to any presidential election at which applicant wishes to vote. Complete all 23statements in full.SB923,5,11APPLICATION FOR PRESIDENTIALSB923,5,22ELECTOR’S ABSENTEE BALLOTSB923,5,33(To be voted at the Presidential ElectionSB923,5,44on November ...., .... (year)SB923,5,135I, .... hereby swear or affirm that I am a citizen of the United States, formerly 6residing at .... in the .... ward .... aldermanic district (city, town, village) of ...., 7County of .... for 28 10 consecutive days prior to leaving the State of Wisconsin. I, .... 8do solemnly swear or affirm that I do not qualify to register or vote under the laws 9of the State of ....(State you now reside in) where I am presently residing. A citizen 10must be a resident of: State ....(Insert time) County ....(Insert time) City, Town or 11Village ....(Insert time), in order to be eligible to register or vote therein. I further 12swear or affirm that my legal residence was established in the State of ....(the State 13where you now reside) on .... Month .... Day .... Year.SB923,5,1414Signed ....SB923,5,1515Address ....(Present address)SB923,5,1616....(City) ....(State)SB923,5,1717Subscribed and sworn to before me this .... day of .... .... (year)SB923,5,1818....(Notary Public, or other officer authorized to administer oaths.)SB923,5,1919....(County)SB923,5,2020My Commission expiresSB923,5,2121MAIL BALLOT TO:SB923,5,2222NAME ....SB923,5,2323ADDRESS ....SB923,6,11CITY .... STATE .... ZIP CODE ....SB923,6,62Penalties for Violations. Whoever swears falsely to any absent elector affidavit 3under this section may be fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned for not more 4than 6 months or both. Whoever intentionally votes more than once in an election 5may be fined not more than $10,000 or imprisoned for not more than 3 years and 6 6months or both.SB923,6,77....(Municipal Clerk)SB923,6,88....(Municipality)SB923,89Section 8. 6.22 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:SB923,6,12106.22 (7) Extension of privilege. This section applies to all military electors 11for 28 10 days after the date of discharge from a uniformed service or termination of 12services or employment of individuals specified in sub. (1) (b) 1. to 4.SB923,913Section 9. 6.29 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB923,7,3146.29 (2) (a) Any qualified elector of a municipality who has not previously 15filed a registration form or whose name does not appear on the registration list of 16the municipality may register after the close of registration but not later than 5 17p.m. or the close of business, whichever is later, on the Friday before an election at 18the office of the municipal clerk and at the office of the clerk’s agent if the clerk 19delegates responsibility for electronic maintenance of the registration list to an 20agent under s. 6.33 (5) (b). The elector shall complete, in the manner provided 21under s. 6.33 (2), a registration form containing all information required under s. 226.33 (1). The registration form shall also contain the following certification: “I, ...., 23hereby certify that, to the best of my knowledge, I am a qualified elector, having 1resided at ... for at least 28 10 consecutive days immediately preceding this election, 2and I have not voted at this election”. The elector shall also provide proof of 3residence under s. 6.34.SB923,104Section 10. 6.55 (2) (a) (form) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb923 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb923 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB923 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB923 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB923: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting